Massachusetts, session 194th, H3361.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39P of Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking the word
“thirty” each time it appears and inserting in place thereof the word “fifteen” and is further
amended by adding at the end thereof the following:-
, but such date shall not exceed 60 days from submission.
of 1